Washington statutes.
RCW 11.108.900

Application of chapter—Application of 2006 c 360.

(1) This chapter applies to all estates, trusts, and governing instruments in existence on or any time after March 7, 1984, and to all proceedings with respect thereto after that date, whether the proceedings commenced before or after that date, and including distributions made after that date. This chapter shall not apply to any governing instrument the terms of which expressly or by necessary implication make this chapter inapplicable. The judicial and nonjudicial dispute resolution procedures of chapter 11.96A RCW apply to this chapter.

(2) Sections 3 through 6, chapter 360, Laws of 2006 are remedial in nature and shall be liberally applied in order to achieve the purposes of chapter 360, Laws of 2006.

[ 2006 c 360 s 7; 1999 c 42 s 631; 1985 c 30 s 112. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 146.]

NOTES:

Clarification of laws—Enforceability of act—Severability—2006 c 360: See notes following RCW 11.108.070.

Effective date—1999 c 42: See RCW 11.96A.902.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.